Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Penalties

18A.990.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

or of the rules shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall upon conviction be punished therefor with a sentence of from thirty (30) days to a maximum of six (6) months in jail.

Any person who is convicted of a misdemeanor under KRS

18A.005

to

18A.200

shall, for a period of five (5) years, be ineligible for appointment to or employment in a position by the Commonwealth, and if he is an officer or employee of the Commonwealth, shall forfeit his office or position.

Any officer or employee of the classified service who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

18A.140

shall forfeit his office or position, and for one (1) year shall be ineligible for any office or position in the Commonwealth’s service. Violation of KRS

18A.140

shall constitute a misdemeanor subject to a sentence of from thirty (30) days to a maximum of six (6) months in jail.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1982, ch. 448, § 56, effective July 15, 1982.